New York, session 2025-2026, A6789.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph a of subdivision 4 of section 2 3602 of the education law, as amended by section 9-b of part CCC of 3 chapter 59 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 4 (2) The regional cost index shall reflect an analysis of labor market 5 costs based on median salaries in professional occupations that require 6 similar credentials to those of positions in the education field, but 7 not including those occupations in the education field, provided that 8 the regional cost indices for the [two thousand seven--two thousand 9 eight] two thousand twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six school year and 10 thereafter shall be as follows: 11 Labor Force Region Index 12 Capital District 1.124 13 Southern Tier 1.045 14 Western New York 1.091 15 Hudson Valley 1.314 16 (excluding 17 Westchester) 18 Westchester 1.425 19 Long Island/NYC 1.425 20 Finger Lakes 1.141 21 Central New York 1.103 22 Mohawk Valley 1.000 23 North Country 1.000 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09256-01-5 A. 6789 2 1 § 2. Paragraph b of subdivision 16 of section 3602 of the education 2 law, as amended by section 18 of part B of chapter 57 of the laws of 3 2008, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. Tier 1 high tax aid apportionment. For any tier 1 eligible school 5 district, the tier 1 high tax aid apportionment shall be the greater of 6 (1) the product of the public school district enrollment of the district 7 in the base year, as computed pursuant to subparagraph two of paragraph 8 n of subdivision one of this section, multiplied by the product of four 9 hundred fifty dollars multiplied by the state sharing ratio, or (2) one 10 hundred thousand dollars. In no event shall a district receive less than 11 the amount to which it was entitled pursuant to this paragraph. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.